vi: Đồ gỗ > Tủ và đồ đựng: Tủ đựng quần áo; Tủ Buffet; Tủ bát đĩa; Linh kiện và phụ kiện tủ quần áo; Tủ quần áo; Tủ nhỏ; Tủ đựng tài liệu; Tủ là quần áo; Tủ bếp; Giá đựng báo; Tủ và giá để báo, tạp chí, đĩa CD; Tủ phụ; Tủ và ngăn chứa đồ; Rương trữ đồ; Bàn trang điểm; Tủ đựng rượu; Giá để rượu
en: Furniture > Cabinets & Storage: Armoires & Wardrobes; Buffets; China Cabinets & Hutches; Closet Parts & Accessories; Closets; Dressers; File Cabinets; Ironing Centers; Kitchen Cabinets; Magazine Racks; Media Storage Cabinets & Racks; Sideboards; Storage Cabinets & Lockers; Storage Chests; Vanities; Wine & Liquor Cabinets; Wine Racks
ru: Мебель > Шкафы и мебель для хранения: Большие шкафы и гардеробы; Шкафы-горки; Серванты и буфеты; Детали и аксессуары для шкафов-кладовок; Шкафы-кладовки; Комоды; Шкафы для документов; Шкафы с гладильными досками; Кухонные шкафы; Стеллажи и подставки для журналов; Шкафы и стеллажи для носителей информации; Посудные шкафы; Запирающиеся шкафчики; Сундуки; Туалетные столики, тумбы и шкафчики; Шкафы для вина и крепких напитков; Винные стеллажи
de: Möbel > Schränke: Kleiderschränke; Buffets; Geschirrschränke; Schrankteile und Zubehör; Wandschränke; Kommoden; Aktenschränke; Bügelcenter; Küchenschränke; Zeitschriftenständer; Mediaaufbewahrung; Sideboards; Aufbewahrungs- & Aussteuertruhen; Aufbewahrungstruhen; Wasch- und Schminktische; Spirituosenschränke; Weinregale
nb: Møbler > Skap og lagring: Garderober; Buffeter; Serviseskap; Skapdeler og tilbehør; Skap; Kommoder; Arkivskap; Strykeskap; Kjøkkenskap; Magasinstativer; Skap og stativer for medielagring; Skjenker; Lagringsskap; Lagringskister; Sminkebord; Vin- og brennevinsskap; Vinstativer
el: Έπιπλα > Ντουλάπια & αποθήκευση: Ντουλάπια & ντουλάπες; Μπουφέδες; Βιτρίνες & ντουλάπια για σκεύη; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ ντουλάπας; Ντουλάπες; Συρταριέρες; Ντουλάπια αρχείων; Σταθμοί σιδερώματος; Ντουλάπια Κουζίνας; Ράφια για περιοδικά; Ντουλάπια & ράφια αποθήκευσης πολυμέσων; Πλαϊνοί μπουφέδες; Ντουλάπια αποθήκευσης & ντουλάπια με κλειδαριά; Κουτιά/κιβώτια αποθήκευσης; Τουαλέτες (έπιπλα); Ντουλάπια κρασιών & ποτών; Ράφια κρασιών
sv: Möbler > Skåp och lagring: Skåp och garderober; Skänkar; Porslinsskåp och hyllskänkar; Garderobsdelar och tillbehör; Garderober; Byråer; Arkivskåp; Strykbrädeskåp; Köksskåp; Tidskriftshyllor; Medieförvaring; Sideboards; Förvaringsskåp och garderober; Lagringskistor; Toalettbord och underskåp; Vin- och spritskåp; Vinställ
nl: Meubelen > Kasten en opbergmeubelen: Grote kledingkasten; Grote buffetten; Porseleinkasten; Accessoires en onderdelen voor kasten; Overige kasten; Dressoirs; Archiefkasten; Strijkstations; Keukenkasten; Magazijnrekken; Mediakasten en -rekken; Kleine buffetten; Opbergkasten en -kluisjes; Opslagkisten; Kaptafels; Wijn- en drankenkasten; Wijnrekken
es: Mobiliario > Armarios y almacenamiento: Armarios roperos; Bufés; Vitrinas; Piezas y accesorios para clósets; Armarios; Aparadores del dormitorio; Armarios archivadores; Centros de planchado; Armarios de cocina; Revisteros; Almacenamiento para CD y DVD; Aparadores; Taquillas y armarios de almacenamiento; Baúles de almacenamiento; Tocadores; Armarios para vino y licores; Botelleros
hu: Bútor > Szekrények és tárolók: Szekrények és ruhásszekrények; Büfék; Kínai szekrények és vitrinek; Szekrényalkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Szekrények; Öltözők; Iratszekrények; Vasalóközpontok; Konyhaszekrények; Magazinállványok; Médiatároló szekrények és állványok; Oldalszekrények; Tárolószekrények; Tárolóládák; Sminkasztalok; Bor- és italszekrények; Borállványok
cs: Nábytek > Skříně a úložné prostory: Almary; Komody; Porcelánové vitríny; Šatní díly a příslušenství; Šatníky a šatní skříně; Šatníky; Kartotéky; Žehlicí centra; Kuchyňské skříňky a příborníky; Přihrádky na časopisy; Skříňky a přihrádky na mediální nosiče; Skříňky; Úložné a šatní skříňky; Úložné truhly; Toaletní stolky; Skříňky na víno a alkohol; Regály na víno
fi: Huonekalut > Kaapit ja säilytys: Vaatekaapit; Senkit; Astiakaapit ja vitriinit; Kaappien osat ja tarvikkeet; Kaapit; Lipastot; Arkistokaapit; Silityskeskukset; Keittiönkaapit; Lehtitelineet; Mediakaapit ja -hyllyt; Hyllykkökaapit; Säilytyskaapit ja -lokerot; Säilytysarkut; Kampauspöydät; Viini- ja viinakaapit; Viinitelineet
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Armários e armazenamento: Roupeiros e guarda roupas; Aparadores; Cristaleiras e estantes; Partes e acessórios de armários; Armários; Cómodas; Armários de ficheiros; Centros de engomar; Armários de cozinha; Estantes de arrumação; Armários e estantes de armazenamento multimédia; Móveis aparadores; Armários e cacifos de armazenamento; Baús de arrumação; Toucadores; Garrafeiras; Adegas
ko: 가구 > 캐비닛/수납장: 장식장/옷장; 뷔페; 식기 장식장/그릇장; 붙박이장 부품 및 액세서리; 붙박이장; 의류 서랍장; 서류 캐비닛; 입식 다리미판; 주방 수납장; 잡지꽂이; CD/DVD장; 수납장; 물품 보관함/로커; 보관 상자; 배니티; 와인/양주 수납장; 와인 랙
bg-BG: Мебели > Шкафове и съхранение: Големи шкафове и гардероби; Бюфети; Витрини и шкафове за порцелан; Части и аксесоари за дрешник; Дрешници; Скринове; Шкафове за документи; Станции за гладене; Кухненски шкафове; Стелажи за списания; Шкафове и стелажи за съхранение на аудио- и видеотехника; Бюфети за трапезария; Шкафове и шкафчета с ключалка за съхранение; Сандъци за съхранение; Тоалетки и шкафове с мивки; Шкафове за вино и алкохол; Стелажи за вино
da: Møbler > Skabe og opbevaring: Klædeskabe og garderobeskabe; Vitrineskabe; Kinesiske skabe og kasser; Skab – dele og tilbehør; Skabe; Kommoder; Arkivskabe; Strygestationer; Køkkenskabe; Magasinholdere; Medieopbevaring; Skænke; Opbevaringsskabe og -kabinetter; Dragkister; Små pynteborde; Vin- og spiritusskabe; Vinreoler
tr: Mobilyalar > Dolaplar ve Saklama Mobilyaları: Dekoratif Dolaplar ve Gardıroplar; Büfeler; Vitrinler ve Kapkacak Dolapları; Dolap Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Dolaplar; Şifonyerler; Dosya Dolapları; Ütü Dolapları; Mutfak Dolapları; Mecmualıklar; Medya Saklama Dolapları ve Rafları; Konsollar; Saklama Kabinleri ve Dolapları; Eşya Saklama Sandıkları; Çekmeceli Dolaplar; Şarap ve Likör Dolapları; Şarap Rafları
zh-CN: 家具 > 柜子/储物: 衣柜和大衣橱; 陈列柜组合衣柜; 瓷器柜/储藏柜; 衣柜零件/配件; 衣柜; 斗柜/斗橱; 文件柜; 熨烫柜/壁橱; 厨柜; 杂志架; 碟片柜/架; 餐边柜; 储物柜/箱; 储物箱; 梳妆台; 酒柜; 酒架
fr: Meubles > Armoires et meubles de rangement: Armoires; Buffets; Vaisseliers; Pièces et accessoires de placard; Placards; Commodes; Classeur à tiroirs; Armoires à repasser; Placards de cuisine; Porte-revues; Fixations et meubles de rangement multimédia; Buffet; Casiers et armoires de rangement; Coffres de rangement; Meubles lavabos; Caves à vins et spiritueux; Étagères à bouteilles
ja: 家具 > 収納家具: 衣装ダンス・ワードローブ; バッフェ; カップボード; クローゼット関連用品; クローゼット; タンス・チェスト; ファイルキャビネット; アイロン台付きキャビネット; キッチンキャビネット; マガジンラック; メディア収納家具; サイドボード; ロッカー・キャビネット; 収納ボックス; 化粧台・鏡台; ボトルキャビネット; ワインラック
pt-BR: Móveis > Armários e armazenamento: Guarda-roupas; Aparadores; Cristaleiras; Peças e acessórios para closet; Closets; Cômodas; Arquivos de aço; Móveis com tábua de passar roupa; Armários de cozinha; Porta-revistas; Gabinetes e racks para armazenamento de mídia; Aparadores de mesa; Armários e gabinetes de armazenamento; Caixas de armazenamento; Armários; Armários de vinhos e licores; Suportes para vinho
pl: Meble > Szafy i przechowywanie: Szafy i garderoby; Bufety; Kredensy na porcelanę; Części i akcesoria do garderoby; Garderoby; Komody; Szafy na dokumenty; Szafki do prasowania; Szafki kuchenne; Gazetowniki; Stojaki na płyty; Szafki typu sideboard; Szafki biurowe; Skrzynie i kufry; Toaletki; Szafy na wino i likiery; Regały na wino
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Omare in shranjevanje: Omare za oblačila in garderobne omare; Bifeji; Omarice in nadstavki za porcelan; Deli in dodatki za omare; Omare; Predalniki; Omarice shranjevanje dokumentov; Likalne postaje; Kuhinjske omarice; Stojala za revije; Omarice in stojala za shranjevanje medijev; Komode; Omarice in predali za shranjevanje; Skrinje za shranjevanje; Mizice za ličenje; Omarice za vino in alkoholne pijače; Vinska stojala
zh-TW: 家具 > 櫥櫃和收納: 拉門式櫥櫃/衣櫃; 餐具櫃; 瓷器櫃; 衣櫃零件與配件; 衣櫥; 五斗櫃; 資料櫃; 燙衣用具收納櫃; 廚房櫥櫃; 雜誌架; 視聽櫃/視聽架; 邊櫃; 置物櫃; 收納箱; 梳妝台; 酒櫃; 葡萄酒架
hr-HR: Namještaj > Elementi i pohrana: Ormari i garderobe; Bifei; Elementi za posuđe i regali; Dijelovi i dodaci za ormare; Ormari; Komode; Uredski ormarići; Elementi za peglanje; Kuhinjski elementi; Police za časopise; Ormari i police za pohranu medija; Ormari za posuđe; Elementi i ormarići za odlaganje; Škrinje za odlaganje; Elementi za umivaonik; Elementi za vino i pića; Police za vino
ro-RO: Mobilier > Dulăpioare și spații de depozitare: Dulapuri masive și dulapuri de haine; Servante; Dulăpioare pentru veselă și dulapuri cu vitrină; Piese și accesorii pentru dressinguri; Dressinguri; Comode pentru haine; Fișete; Stații de călcat; Dulăpioare de bucătărie; Suporturi pentru reviste; Dulapuri și rafturi pentru stocare suporturi media; Bufete; Dulăpioare și dulapuri de depozitare; Cufere de depozitare; Măsuțe de toaletă; Dulăpioare pentru vin și băuturi; Stative pentru vin
lt-LT: Baldai > Spintelės ir sandėliavimas: Spintos ir drabužių spintos; Bufetai; Spintelės ir indaujos porcelianui; Spintų dalys ir priedai; Integruotos spintos; Komodos; Dokumentų spintos; Lyginimo centrai; Virtuvės spintelės; Žurnalų lentynos; Spintelės ir lentynos medijai; Indų spintelės; Sandėliavimo spintelės; Sandėliavimo skrynios; Kosmetiniai staliukai; Vyno ir alkoholinių gėrimų spintos; Vyno lentynos
sk-SK: Nábytok > Úložné skrinky: Skrine a šatníky; Príborníky; Vitrínové skrine a nadstavce; Skriňové diely a príslušenstvo; Skrine; Komody; Kartotéky; Výsuvná žehliaca doska; Kuchynské skrinky; Stojany na časopisy; Skrinky a stojany na médiá; Príborníky; Úložné skrine a skrinky; Úložné truhlice; Toaletné stolíky; Skrinky na víno a alkohol; Stojany na víno
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > ตู้และที่จัดเก็บ: ตู้และตู้เสื้อผ้า; ตู้บุฟเฟ่ต์; ตู้เก็บจานและฮัทช์; อะไหล่และอุปกรณ์ตู้เสื้อผ้า; ตู้เสื้อผ้า; ตู้ลิ้นชัก; ตู้เก็บเอกสาร; ตู้สำหรับที่รีดผ้า; ตู้ครัว; ชั้นวางนิตยสาร; ตู้และชั้นจัดเก็บสื่อ; ตู้ไซด์บอร์ด; ตู้และล็อคเกอร์เก็บของ; ชั้นที่มีลิ้นชัก; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้ง; ตู้ไวน์และเหล้า; ชั้นวางไวน์
it: Arredamento > Armadietti e portaoggetti: Armadi; Buffet; Vetrinette e credenze; Parti e accessori per armadio; Armadi; Cassettiere; Archivi; Postazioni per stiratura; Pensili da cucina; Portariviste; Scaffali e armadietti per supporti multimediali; Sideboard; Armadietti e stipi; Bauli e cassapanche; Componenti di arredo; Armadietti per vini e liquori; Rastrelliere vini